Hawaii statutes.
[§321-193.5] Interagency coordination.
(a) The department of public safety, Hawaii paroling authority, judiciary,
department of health, department of human services, and any other agencies
assigned oversight responsibilities for offender substance abuse treatment by
law or administrative order, shall establish a coordinating body through an
interagency cooperative agreement to oversee the development and implementation
of offender substance abuse treatment programs in the State to ensure
compliance with the intent of the master plan developed under chapter 353G.
The coordinating body shall also include a representative from a community
based prisoner advocacy group and a substance abuse treatment provider selected
by the director of health, and an ex-offender selected by the director of
public safety subject to the approval of the chairperson of the Hawaii paroling
authority and the chief justice. The coordinating body shall meet not less
than quarterly in a meeting subject to chapter 92. The interagency cooperative
agreement shall set forth the role of the coordinating body and the
responsibilities of each agency that is a party to the agreement.

(b) The department of health shall be the lead
agency for interagency coordination of substance abuse treatment. As the lead
agency, the department shall act as facilitator of and provide administrative
support to the coordinating body.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision to the
contrary, any agency that is part of the interagency cooperative agreement
shall provide, upon the request of any other participating agency, all medical,
psychological, or mental health records of any offender receiving supervision
or treatment while under custody of the State. Any participating agency
receiving such records of any offender receiving supervision or treatment while
under custody of the State, shall keep that information confidential in
accordance with the requirements of 42 United States Code section 290dd-2. [L
2002, c 161, §2]

Note

Annual report on interagency cooperative agreement. L 2002,
c 161, §10.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next